Massachusetts, session 194th, H1624.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
There shall be an interagency task force to study the public health and social justice
implications of legalizing the possession, consumption, transportation, and distribution of
psilocybin and other naturally cultivated entheogenic plants and fungi. The task force shall
consist of 21 members: 1 member shall be appointed by the senate president, who shall serve as
co-chair; 1 member who shall be appointed by the minority leader of the senate; 1 member who
shall be appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives, who shall serve as co-chair; 1
member who shall be appointed by the minority leader of the house of representatives; 1 member
of the Board of Allied Mental Health and Human Services Professions or its agreed upon
designee; 1 member of the Cannabis Control Commission; 2 members with professional
of 3

advocacy or academic experience with drug-related harm reduction policies and methods, at least
1 of whom should be a practitioner of traditional, ceremonial plant medicine practices; 3
members with training in medicine, social work, public health, or law and expertise in addressing
health disparities and access to care; 4 members with professional, advocacy, or academic
experience promoting racial equity and economic justice, at least 1 of whom shall be a
representative of a Massachusetts recognized Native American tribe; 2 members with
professional scientific expertise in the physiological and psychological effects of the full
spectrum of entheogenic plants, fungi, and natural materials containing indole amines,
tryptamines, phenethylamines, including psilocybin, ayahuasca, cacti, and iboga; the attorney
general of Massachusetts or their designee; the secretary of the executive office of health and
human services or their designee; the secretary of the department of veterans’ services or their
designee; the secretary of the executive office of public safety and security or their designee.
The task force shall: (i) compile and review research regarding the physiological and
psychological effects of entheogenic plants and fungi; (ii) compile testimony and data on the
experiences of communities across the United States—including Somerville (MA), Cambridge
(MA), Denver (CO), Oakland (CA), Santa Cruz (CA), Ann Arbor (MI), sovereign native lands,
Washington D.C. and Oregon—as well as international jurisdictions that pursued harm reduction
strategies with respect to entheogens—including Portugal, the Netherlands, Jamaica, Peru, and
Brazil; (iii) compile and review research regarding the impact of controlled substances
prohibition on marginalized groups, including indigenous people, veterans, people with physical
and mental health disabilities, Black people, people of Latino and Hispanic heritage, people of
Asian descent, people of color, people in poverty, and people identifying with the LGBTQ
community; (iv) compile and review research on the political and cultural origins of prohibition
of 3

policies for controlled substances; (v) develop recommendations for legalizing and eliminating
Massachusetts state penalties for possession, consumption, transportation, manufacture, and
distribution of entheogenic plants and fungi in a manner that maximizes equitable access and
sustainable manufacture of these plants; (vi) identify opportunities for public education on harm-
reduction for controlled substances, including revisions to policies related to the licensing of
physical and mental healthcare workers and therapists across the Commonwealth; (vii) develop
recommendations regarding pardons, parole, diversion, expungement, and equity measures for
people with criminal records related to possession, consumption, and distribution of entheogenic
plants and fungi and other controlled substances; (viii) hear and consider public testimony by
Massachusetts residents who have used entheogenic plants and fungi and/or endured experiences
related to incarceration for controlled substances possession.
The task force shall file a report of its findings and recommendations, together with drafts
of legislation necessary to carry those recommendations into effect, by filing the same with the
clerks of the senate and the house of representatives, the chairs of the senate and house
committees on ways and means, the senate and house chairs of the joint committee on public
health, the senate and house chairs of the joint committee on the judiciary, the senate and house
chairs of the joint committee on public safety and homeland security not later than June 2026.
of 3